North Carolina statutes. Chapter 114. Department of Justice.
Article 1. Attorney General.

§ 114-1.
Creation of Department of Justice under supervision of Attorney General.

There is hereby created a Department of Justice which shall be under the supervision and direction of the Attorney General, as authorized by Article III, Sec. 7, of the Constitution of North Carolina.

History.

1939, c. 315, s. 1; 1973, c. 702, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to Human Trafficking Commission, see

G.S. 114-70

.

Authorize Engagement with Third-Party Toxicology Laboratories to Guide Resources

Session Laws 2019-225, s. 9, provides: “The Department of Health and Human Services, the Department of Justice, local health departments as defined in G.S. 130A-2(5), and local law enforcement agencies are authorized to engage third-party toxicology laboratories, capable of providing clinical intelligence and data related to prescription and illicit drug usage trends and developments, for the purpose of providing data to guide the delivery of drug treatment and law enforcement resources.”

§ 114-1.1.
Common-law powers.

The General Assembly reaffirms that the Attorney General has had and continues to be vested with those powers of the Attorney General that existed at the common law, that are not repugnant to or inconsistent with the Constitution or laws of North Carolina.

History.

1985, c. 479, s. 137.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Changes in the State’s Law Firm: The Powers, Duties and Operations of the Office of the Attorney General,” see 12 Campbell L. Rev. 343 (1990).

§ 114-2.
Duties.

Pursuant to Section 7(2) of Article III of the North Carolina Constitution, it shall be the duty of the Attorney General:

To defend all actions in the appellate division in which the State shall be interested, or a party, and to appear for the State in any other court or tribunal in any cause or matter, civil or criminal, in which the State may be a party or interested. The duty to represent the State in criminal appeals shall not be delegated to any district attorney’s office or any other entity.

To represent all State departments, agencies, institutions, commissions, bureaus or other organized activities of the State which receive support in whole or in part from the State. Where the Attorney General represents a State department, agency, institution, commission, bureau, or other organized activity of the State which receives support in whole or in part from the State, the Attorney General shall act in conformance with Rule 1.2 of the Rules of Professional Conduct of the North Carolina State Bar.

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 702, s. 2.

To consult with and advise the prosecutors, when requested by them, in all matters pertaining to the duties of their office.

To give, when required, his opinion upon all questions of law submitted to him by the General Assembly, or by either branch thereof, or by the Governor, Auditor, Treasurer, or any other State officer.

To pay all moneys received for debts due or penalties to the State immediately after the receipt thereof into the treasury.

To compare the warrants drawn on the State treasury with the laws under which they purport to be drawn.

Subject to the provisions of

G.S. 62-20

:

To intervene, when he deems it to be advisable in the public interest, in proceedings before any courts, regulatory officers, agencies and bodies, both State and federal, in a representative capacity for and on behalf of the using and consuming public of this State. He shall also have the authority to institute and originate proceedings before such courts, officers, agencies or bodies and shall have authority to appear before agencies on behalf of the State and its agencies and citizens in all matters affecting the public interest.

Upon the institution of any proceeding before any State agency by application, petition or other pleading, formal or informal, the outcome of which will affect a substantial number of residents of North Carolina, such agency or agencies shall furnish the Attorney General with copies of all such applications, petitions and pleadings so filed, and, when the Attorney General deems it advisable in the public interest to intervene in such proceedings, he is authorized to file responsive pleadings and to appear before such agency either in a representative capacity in behalf of the using and consuming public of this State or in behalf of the State or any of its agencies.

To notify the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate whenever an action is filed in State or federal court that challenges the validity of a North Carolina statute or provision of the North Carolina Constitution under State or federal law.

Pursuant to

G.S. 120-32.6

, to represent upon request and otherwise abide by and defer to the final decision-making authority exercised by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, as agents of the State through the General Assembly, in defending any State or federal action challenging the validity or constitutionality of an act of the General Assembly or a provision of the North Carolina Constitution. If for any reason the Attorney General cannot perform the duty specified herein, the Attorney General may recuse personally from such defense but shall appoint another attorney employed by the Department of Justice to act at the direction of the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.

History.

1868-9, c. 270, s. 82; 1871-2, c. 112, s. 2; Code, s. 3363; 1893, c. 379; 1901, c. 744; Rev., s. 5380; C.S., s. 7694; 1931, c. 243, s. 5; 1933, c. 134, s. 8; 1941, c. 97; 1967, c. 691, s. 51; 1969, c. 535; 1973, c. 702, s. 2; 1977, c. 468, s. 17; 1979, c. 107, s. 9; 1983, c. 913, s. 15; 2014-100, s. 17.3A(b); 2017-57, s. 6.7(m); 2017-212, s. 5.2(a).

Cross References.

As to actions by the Attorney General, see

G.S. 1-515

.

As to service standards and requirements, see

G.S. 66-356

.

As to duty in prosecuting violations of laws governing monopolies and trusts, see

G.S. 75-13

.

As to administrative remedies and cause of action for complaints regarding exercise of religious activity, see

G.S. 115C-407.31

.

As to vacant positions, see

G.S. 120-12.1

.

As to General Assembly’s authority to employ counsel in addition to or other than the Attorney General, see

G.S. 120-32.6

.

Federal Grant Reporting.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 18.1, provides: “The Department of Correction [now Division of Adult Correction of the Department of Public Safety], the Department of Justice, the Department of Crime Control and Public Safety [now Department of Public Safety], the Judicial Department, and the Department of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention [now Division of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention of the Department of Public Safety] shall report by May 1 of each year to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations, the Chairs of the House of Representatives and Senate Appropriations Committees, and the Chairs of the House of Representatives and Senate Appropriations Subcommittees on Justice and Public Safety on federal grant funds received or preapproved for receipt by those departments. The report shall include information on the amount of grant funds received or preapproved for receipt by each department, the use of the funds, the State match expended to receive the funds, and the period to be covered by each grant. If the department intends to continue the program beyond the end of the grant period, the department shall report on the proposed method for continuing the funding of the program at the end of the grant period. Each department shall also report on any information it may have indicating that the State will be requested to provide future funding for a program presently supported by a local grant.”

For similar prior provisions, see Session Laws 2003-284, s. 16.1, Session Laws 2005-276, s. 17.1, Session Laws 2007-323, s. 17.5, and Session Laws 2009-451, s. 19.2.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 16.2, provides: “The Department of Justice shall use funds available to purchase, or purchase licenses for, time management software to be used to ensure adequate record keeping and management of Department attorneys’ time. The software shall be of a quality and type generally used by attorneys in the private sector.”

Session Laws 2011-189, s. 1, as amended by Session Laws 2013-337, s. 5(a), provides: “(a) The Consumer Protection Division, Department of Justice, shall coordinate a Task Force on Fraud Against Older Adults. The Task Force shall include representatives from the Consumer Protection Division, Department of Justice; Division of Aging and Adult Services, Department of Health and Human Services; North Carolina Senior Consumer Fraud Task Force; North Carolina Association of County Directors of Social Services; the Banking Commission; the Senior Tar Heel Legislature; and other associations as approved by the Consumer Protection Division.

“(b) The Task Force shall include, but should not be limited to, examination of the following issues:

“(1) Identifying, clarifying, and strengthening laws to provide older adults a broader system of protection against abuse and fraud.

“(2) Establishing a statewide system to enable reporting on incidents of fraud and mistreatment of older adults.

“(3) Identifying opportunities for partnership among the Banking Commission, the financial management industry, and law enforcement agencies to prevent fraud against older adults.

“(4) Granting the Attorney General authority to initiate prosecutions for fraud against older adults.

“(c) The Task Force shall make a report to the North Carolina Study Commission on Aging on or before November 1, 2011, and a report including findings, recommendations, and draft legislation to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services on or before February 1, 2013. The Task Force shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services prior to the 2014 Regular Session of the 2013 General Assembly on the efficacy of any of the Task Force’s recommendations that are adopted. The Task Force shall terminate on May 1, 2015, or upon the filing of its final report, whichever occurs first.”

Session Laws 2013-337, s. 5(b), provides: “The Consumer Protection Division, Department of Justice, shall add the following to its list of approved associations represented on the Task Force:

“(1) The North Carolina Credit Union League.

“(2) An association representing nondepository financial institutions.

“(3) The North Carolina Bar Association, whose participating representatives shall include attorneys involved in protecting the privacy and property interests of disabled and older adults.”

Session Laws 2012-142, s. 15.3(a), provides: “The Department of Justice, Health Insurance Consumer Protection Unit, and any portion of the Managed Care Patient Assistance Program managed by the Department of Justice is transferred to the Department of Insurance. This transfer shall have all of the elements of a Type I transfer, as described in

G.S. 143A-6

.”

§ 114-2.1.
Consent judgments.

In litigation in which the State is interested or is a party, no consent judgment shall be entered into by the State unless and no consent judgment shall be binding on the State except to the extent that the State’s entire obligation for the current and for future fiscal years will be satisfied with funds that are available for that purpose for the current fiscal year, including funds that the Council of State agrees to allot from the Contingency and Emergency Fund, provided that for payments of tort claims and workers’ compensation claims it shall not be binding on the State except to the extent that the State’s entire obligation for the current and for future fiscal years can be satisfied with funds that are available for the current fiscal year, including funds that the Council of State agrees to allot from the Contingency and Emergency Fund. The Director of the Budget shall report to the appropriation committees of the General Assembly concerning all funds made available during the preceding fiscal year from the Contingency and Emergency Fund for the purpose of carrying out consent judgments.

History.

1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1282, s. 51; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 95; c. 1116, s. 85.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1984 administrative law, “A Declining Role for the Attorney General,” see 63 N.C.L. Rev. 1051 (1985).

§ 114-2.2.
Consent judgments.

To be effective against the State, a consent judgment entered into by the State, a State department, State agency, State institution, or a State officer who is a party in his official capacity must be signed personally by the Attorney General. This power of approval may not be delegated to a deputy or assistant Attorney General or to any other subordinate. This subsection shall not apply to consent judgments that name as a party a State department, agency, institution, or officer.

(a1)

Where a dispute, claim, or controversy names as a party a State department, agency, or institution, or officer, a consent judgment shall be approved by the head of the department, agency, or institution, or by the State officer, before the judgment may be entered.

(a2)

Where a dispute, claim, or controversy is challenging a North Carolina statute or provision of the North Carolina Constitution, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate (i) have jointly intervened on behalf of the General Assembly in accordance with

G.S. 1-72.2

or (ii) are otherwise jointly named in their official capacities as parties to the dispute, claim, or controversy, a consent judgment shall be jointly approved by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, or by and through counsel of their choice, before the judgment may be entered.

The provisions of this section are supplemental to

G.S. 114-2.1

.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the Attorney General by rule may delegate to a deputy or assistant Attorney General or to another subordinate the power to sign consent judgments in condemnation or eminent domain actions brought under the provisions of Chapters 40A or 136 of the General Statutes and consent judgments under the provision of Article 31 of Chapter 143 (Tort Claims Act) and Chapter 97 (Workers’ Compensation Act) of the General Statutes.

History.

1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 95; c. 1116, s. 85; 2014-100, s. 17.3A(c); 2021-180, s. 18.7(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 18.7(d), made subsection (a2) of this section, as added by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 18.7(a), effective November 18, 2021, and applicable to consent judgments, settlement agreements, or other agreements that would dispose of a dispute, claim, or controversy entered on or after that date.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021’.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 17.3A(c), effective August 7, 2014, substituted “Consent judgments” for “Attorney General to approve consent judgments” in the section heading; added the last sentence in subsection (a); and added subsection (a1).

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 18.7(a), effective November 18, 2021, added subsection (a2). For effective date and applicability, see editor’s note.

§ 114-2.3.
Use of private counsel limited.

Every agency, institution, department, bureau, board, or commission of the State, authorized by law to retain private counsel, shall obtain written permission from the Attorney General prior to employing private counsel. This section does not apply to counties, cities, towns, other municipal corporations or political subdivisions of the State, or any agencies of these municipal corporations or political subdivisions, or to county or city boards of education. This subsection does not apply to private counsel retained by the Judicial Department for the defense of an official or employee of the Department in any action arising from conduct undertaken in the course of the official’s or employee’s official duties and in which the Attorney General has declined to provide the litigation services.

Article 2A of this Chapter applies to any contract to retain private counsel authorized by the Attorney General under this section.

Except as provided in

G.S. 147-17

, the Attorney General shall represent the State in any action requiring the State to be a party under

G.S. 1-72.3

.

No State funds shall be withdrawn from the State treasury to pay for litigation services provided by private counsel except as expressly authorized by an appropriation of the General Assembly. As used in this subsection, litigation services include legal work conducted in anticipation of, or in preparation for, any suit or action. As used in this section, private counsel includes any licensed attorney retained by, engaged by, or otherwise representing a department, officer, agency, institution, commission, bureau, or other organized activity of the State but does not include a licensed attorney who holds a permanent budgeted position in either the Department of Justice or the applicable department, officer, agency, institution, commission, bureau, or other organized activity of the State.

History.

1985, c. 479, s. 135; 2014-110, s. 1.2; 2016-109, s. 2(b); 2017-57, s. 6.7(b); 2021-180, s. 16.10(c).

Outside Legal Counsel/Department of Transportation.

Session Laws
2013-360, s. 7.17(f), provides: “Expert Counsel Required. — Notwithstanding

G.S. 114-2.3

, the Department of Revenue shall engage the services of private counsel with the pertinent information technology and computer law expertise to negotiate and review contracts associated with an additional public-private arrangement authorized under this section.”

Session Laws
2013-360, s. 34.27, as amended by Session Laws
2014-100, s. 34.24(a), provides:
“The Department of Transportation may engage the services of private counsel with the pertinent expertise to provide legal services related to transportation projects undertaken by the Department. The Department shall supervise and manage the private counsel engaged under this section and shall not be required to obtain written permission or approval from the Attorney General under

G.S. 114-2.3

.”

Session Laws
2015-241, s. 29.8(a) effective July 1, 2015, repealed Session Laws
2013-360, s. 34.27, as amended by Session Laws
2014-100, s. 34.24(a).

Session Laws
2009-451, s. 10.41(c), provides: “(c) Notwithstanding

G.S. 114-2.3

, the Department shall engage the services of private counsel with the pertinent information technology and computer law expertise to review requests for proposals and to negotiate and review contracts associated with MMIS. The counsel engaged by the Department shall review the MMIS contract between the Department and the vendor to ensure that the requirements of subsection (a) of this section are met in their entirety.”

For similar prior provisions, see Session Laws
2007-323, s. 10.40D(a) and (b), as amended by Session Laws 2008-107, 10.9(a).

Session Laws
2011-145, s. 10.29(f), provides: “Notwithstanding

G.S. 114-2.3

, the Department shall engage the services of private counsel with pertinent information technology and computer law expertise to review requests for proposals and to negotiate and review contracts associated with the replacement MMIS [Medicaid Management Information System]. This shall include amendments exceeding ten million dollars ($10,000,000). The counsel engaged by the Department shall review the replacement MMIS [Medicaid Management Information System] contracts and amendments between the Department and the vendor to ensure that the requirements of subsection (d) of this section are met in their entirety and that the terms of the contract are in the State’s best interest.”

Session Laws
2013-360, s. 12A.4(e), provides: “Notwithstanding

G.S. 114-2.3

, the Department shall consult with the Office of the SCIO concerning the retention of private counsel for the replacement MMIS, and as directed by the Office of the SCIO, retain private counsel with expertise in pertinent information technology and computer law to negotiate and review contract amendments associated with the replacement MMIS. The private counsel engaged by the Department shall review the replacement MMIS contract amendments between the Department and the vendors to ensure that the requirements of subsection (c) of this section are met in their entirety and that the terms of the contract amendments are in the State’s best interest.”

§ 114-2.4.
Settlement agreements.

The Attorney General shall review the terms of all proposed agreements entered into by the State or a State department, agency, institution, or officer to settle or resolve litigation or potential litigation, that involves the payment of public monies in the sum of seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) or more. In order for such an agreement or contract to be effective against the State, the Attorney General shall submit to the State or the State department, agency, institution, or officer a written opinion regarding the terms of the proposed agreement and the advisability of entering into the agreement, prior to entering into the agreement. The written opinion required by this section shall be maintained in the official file of the final settlement agreement. The Attorney General by rule may delegate to a deputy or assistant Attorney General or to another subordinate the authority to review settlement agreements.

(a1)

Where a dispute, claim, or controversy names as a party a State department, agency, or institution, or officer, a proposed settlement agreement or other agreement that would dispose of the dispute, claim, or controversy shall be approved by the head of the department, agency, or institution, or by the State officer, before the agreement may be entered.

(a2)

Where a dispute, claim, or controversy is challenging a North Carolina statute or provision of the North Carolina Constitution, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate (i) have intervened on behalf of the General Assembly in accordance with

G.S. 1-72.2

or (ii) are otherwise jointly named in their official capacities as parties to the dispute, claim, or controversy, a proposed settlement agreement or other agreement that would dispose of the dispute, claim, or controversy shall be jointly approved by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, or by and through counsel of their choice, before the agreement may be entered.

The Attorney General shall report to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations on all agreements entered into by the State or a State department, agency, institution, or officer to settle or resolve litigation or potential litigation, that involves the payment of public monies in the sum of seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) or more.

History.

1997-443, s. 20.14(a); 2014-100, s. 17.3A(d); 2021-180, s. 18.7(b).

§ 114-2.4A.
Disposition of funds received by the State or a State agency from a settlement or other final order or judgment of the court.

Definition. — For purposes of this section, the term “settlement” means an agreement entered into by the State or a State agency, with or without a court’s participation, that ends (i) a dispute, lawsuit, or part of the dispute or lawsuit or (ii) the involvement of the State or State agency in the dispute, lawsuit, or part of the dispute or lawsuit. This term includes settlement agreements, stipulation agreements, consent judgments, and consent decrees.

Prohibition. — The following restrictions shall apply:

Funds received by the State or a State agency from a settlement or other final order or judgment of the court shall not be transferred or expended pursuant to

G.S. 143C-6-4

and shall remain unexpended until the funds are appropriated by the General Assembly. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to prohibit the expenditure of funds to any of the following:

A party, other than the State or a State agency, to the dispute or lawsuit.

A consumer entitled to a refund or the recovery of damages.

An attorney awarded attorneys’ fees for representing (i) a party under sub-subdivision a. of this subdivision or (ii) a consumer under sub-subdivision b. of this subdivision.

The Attorney General, any subordinate who has been delegated the authority to negotiate or approve a settlement, and any private counsel retained to represent a State agency shall have no authority to include or agree to terms or conditions in any settlement that authorizes the expenditure, transfer, or award of funds to any person or entity other than any of the following:

A party, other than the State or a State agency, to the dispute or lawsuit.

A consumer entitled to a refund or the recovery of damages.

An attorney awarded attorneys’ fees for representing (i) a party under sub-subdivision a. of this subdivision or (ii) a consumer under sub-subdivision b. of this subdivision.

Exception. — Subsections (b) and (e) of this section shall not apply to:

Funds received by the Department of Health and Human Services to the extent those funds represent the recovery of previously expended Medicaid funds.

Funds received by the Escheat Fund and benefit plans administered by the Department of State Treasurer.

Funds received by the Department of Transportation to the extent those funds represent the recovery of funds previously expended by the Department of Transportation.

Recommendation. — The Attorney General may provide a nonbinding written recommendation to the chairs of the Senate and House Appropriations Committees for their consideration as to what purpose the funds subject to the prohibition in subsection (b) of this section should be appropriated for.

Overrealized Receipts. — Any provision of law authorizing the expenditure of overrealized receipts shall not apply to the funds referred to in subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of this section unless the language of the law specifically references this section or specifically references funds received by the State or a State agency from a settlement or other final order or judgment of the court.

Required Disposition. — If the terms of a federal grant, another provision of State or federal law, or the State Constitution require a specific disposition of funds received from a settlement or other final order or judgment of the court, nothing in this section shall be construed to supersede, or authorize a deviation from, that specific disposition. Furthermore, nothing in this subsection shall be construed to abrogate the requirement that funds drawn from the State treasury be in consequence of appropriations made by law.

Required Submission. — In addition to any other report or filing that may be required by law, and unless the settlement is sealed pursuant to a written order of the court in accordance with

G.S. 132-1.3

or federal law, the Attorney General’s Office shall submit a copy to the Legislative Library of any settlement or other final order or judgment of the court in which the State or a State agency receives funds in excess of seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000). The submission required by this subsection shall be made within 60 days of the date (i) the settlement is entered into or (ii) the final order or judgment of the court is entered. Any information deemed confidential by State or federal law shall be redacted from the copy of the settlement or other final order or judgment of the court prior to submitting it to the Legislative Library.

History.

2014-100, s. 6.6(a); 2015-67, s. 5; 2017-57, s. 34.7A.

§ 114-2.5.
Attorney General to report payment of public monies pursuant to settlement agreements and final court orders.

Not less than 30 days prior to the disbursement of funds received by the State or a State agency pursuant to a settlement agreement or final order or judgment of the court where the amount of funds received exceeds seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000), the Attorney General shall file a written report with the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations and the Chairs of the Appropriations Subcommittees on Justice and Public Safety of the Senate and House of Representatives on the payments received by the State or a State agency. The Attorney General shall also report on the terms or conditions of payment and of any disbursements set forth in the agreement or order. The Attorney General shall submit a written report to the Fiscal Research Division of the General Assembly.

This section only applies to executed settlement agreements and final orders or judgments of the court and shall in no way affect the authority of the Attorney General to negotiate the settlement of cases in which the State or a State department, agency, institution, or officer is a party.

History.

1998-212, s. 18.7(b); 1999-237, s. 19(b).

§ 114-2.5A.
Report by the Medicaid Fraud Control Unit required annually.

By September 1 of each year, the Medicaid Fraud Control Unit of the Department of Justice shall file a written report about its activities with the Chairs of the Appropriations Subcommittees on Justice and Public Safety and Health and Human Services of the Senate and House of Representatives and with the Fiscal Research Division of the Legislative Services Office. This report may be combined with the report required by

G.S. 1-617

and shall include the following information about the Unit’s activities during the previous fiscal year:

The number of matters reported to the Unit.

The number of cases investigated.

The number of criminal convictions and civil settlements.

The total amount of funds recovered in each case.

The allocation of recovered funds in each case to (i) the federal government; (ii) the State Medical Assistance Program; (iii) the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund; (iv) the Department of Justice; and (v) other victims.

History.

2010-31, s. 16.1.

§ 114-2.5B.
Annual report on grant funds received or preapproved for receipt.

The Department of Justice shall report by May 1 of each year to the chairs of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Justice and Public Safety and the Senate Appropriations Committee on Justice and Public Safety on grant funds received or preapproved for receipt by the Department. The report shall include information on the amount of grant funds received or preapproved for receipt by the Department, the use of the funds, the State match expended to receive the funds, and the period to be covered by each grant. If the Department intends to continue the program beyond the end of the grant period, the Department shall report on the proposed method for continuing the funding of the program at the end of the grant period. The Department shall also report on any information it may have indicating that the State will be requested to provide future funding for a program presently supported by a local grant.

History.

2021-180, s. 19A.1(b).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.8, made this section, as added by Session Laws
2021-180, s. 19A.1(b), effective July 1, 2021.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021’.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

§ 114-2.6.
Attorney General to report on pending lawsuits in which State is a party.

By April 1 and October 1 of each year, the Attorney General shall submit a report to the Chairs of the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations, the Chairs of the Appropriations Committees of the Senate and House of Representatives, the Chairs of the Finance Committees of the Senate and House of Representatives, and the Fiscal Research Division of the Legislative Services Office on any lawsuit in which the constitutionality of a North Carolina law has been challenged and on any case in which plaintiffs seek in excess of one million dollars ($1,000,000) in damages. In addition, the Attorney General shall submit a written report to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations, the Chairs of the Appropriations Committees of the Senate and House of Representatives, the Chairs of the Finance Committees of the Senate and House of Representatives, and the Fiscal Research Division of the Legislative Services Office within 30 days of a final judgment that orders the State to pay the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more.

History.

2001-424, s. 23.11(a).

§ 114-2.7.

Recodified as

G.S. 143B-901

by Session Laws 2014-100, s. 17.1(g), effective July 1, 2014.

§ 114-3.
To devote whole time to duties.

The Attorney General shall devote his whole time to the duties of the office and shall not engage in the private practice of law.

History.

1929, c. 1, s. 1.

§ 114-4.
Assistants; compensation; assignments.

The Attorney General shall be allowed to appoint from among his staff such number of assistant attorneys general as he shall deem advisable, and each of such assistant attorneys general shall be subject to all of the provisions of Chapter 126 of the General Statutes relating to the State Human Resources system. Two assistant attorneys general shall be assigned to the State Department of Revenue. The other assistant attorneys general shall perform such duties as may be assigned by the Attorney General: Provided, however, the provisions of this section shall not be construed as preventing the Attorney General from assigning additional duties to the assistant attorneys general assigned to the State Department of Revenue.

History.

1925, c. 207, s. 1; 1937, c. 357; 1945, c. 786; 1947, c. 182; 1967, c. 260, s. 1; 1973, c. 702, s. 3; 2014-115, s. 55.4(c).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2014-115, s. 55.4(c), effective August 11, 2014, substituted “State Human Resources system” for “State Personnel System” at the end of the first sentence.

§ 114-4.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 702, s. 4.

§ 114-4.2.
Assistant attorneys general and other attorneys to assist Department of Transportation.

The Attorney General is authorized to appoint from among his staff such assistant attorneys general and such other staff attorneys as he shall deem advisable to provide all legal assistance for the State highway functions of the Department of Transportation, and such assistant attorneys general and other attorneys shall also perform such additional duties as may be assigned to them by the Attorney General, and shall otherwise be subject to all provisions of the statutes relating to assistant attorneys general and other staff attorneys. There shall be appropriated from the State Highway Fund such sum as may be necessary to pay the salaries of said assistant attorneys general and other attorneys and necessary secretaries. The Department of Transportation shall provide adequate office space, equipment and supplies.

History.

1957, c. 65, s. 9; 1965, c. 55, s. 16; c. 408, s. 1; 1973, c. 702, s. 5; 1975, c. 716, s. 7; 1977, c. 464, s. 36.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1984 administrative law, “A Declining Role for the Attorney General,” see 63 N.C.L. Rev. 1051 (1985).

§ 114-4.2A.
Assistant attorney general assigned to State Insurance Department.

Such assistant attorneys general as are assigned to the Commissioner of Insurance and the State Insurance Department by the Attorney General shall perform such additional duties as may be assigned to them by the Attorney General, and shall otherwise be subject to all provisions of the statutes relating to assistant attorneys general.

History.

1967, c. 1115, s. 1; 1973, c. 702, s. 6.

§ 114-4.2B.
Employment of attorney for University of North Carolina Hospitals at Chapel Hill.

The Attorney General is hereby authorized to employ an attorney to be assigned by him full time to the University of North Carolina Hospitals at Chapel Hill. Such attorney shall be subject to all the provisions of Chapter 126 of the General Statutes, relating to the State Human Resources system. Such attorney shall also perform additional duties as may be assigned to him by the Attorney General.

The attorney employed by the Attorney General under provisions of this section shall be paid from the funds of the University of North Carolina Hospitals at Chapel Hill.

History.

1975, c. 526, s. 1; 1989, c. 141, s. 3; 2014-115, s. 55.4(c).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2014-115, s. 55.4(c), effective August 11, 2014, substituted “State Human Resources system” for “State Personnel System” near the end of the second sentence.

§ 114-4.2C.
Employment of attorney for the Real Estate Commission.

The Attorney General is hereby authorized to employ an attorney and assign him full time to the North Carolina Real Estate Commission. Such attorney shall be subject to all the provisions of Chapter 126 of the General Statutes relating to the State Human Resources system. Such attorney shall also perform such additional duties as may be assigned to him by the Attorney General.

The North Carolina Real Estate Commission shall fully reimburse the North Carolina Department of Justice for the compensation of such attorney employed under the provisions of this section.

History.

1975, c. 835, ss. 1, 2; 1983, c. 81, s. 1; 2014-115, s. 55.4(c).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2014-115, s. 55.4(c), effective August 11, 2014, substituted “State Human Resources system” for “State Personnel System” near the end of the second sentence.

§ 114-4.2D.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2014-4, s. 29(a), effective June 4, 2014.

History.

1979, c. 942; 1989, c. 751, s. 7(11); 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 959, s. 29; 2000-140, s. 76(e); 2010-142, s. 7; 2013-365, s. 8(l); repealed by 2014-4, s. 29(a), effective June 4, 2014.

§ 114-4.2E.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1981, c. 859, s. 13.10.

§ 114-4.2F.
Designation of attorney specializing in the law of the handicapped.

The Attorney General is authorized to designate from his staff an attorney to specialize in the law of the handicapped. The attorney so designated shall act as advisor to the Division of Vocational Rehabilitation, the Division of Services for the Deaf and the Hard of Hearing, the North Carolina School for the Deaf and the Governor Morehead School.

History.

1983, c. 850, s. 1; 1989, c. 533, s. 7.

§ 114-4.2G.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2002-168, s. 6, effective October 1, 2002.

Cross References.

As to retention of private counsel by the North Carolina Board of Landscape Architects, see

G.S. 89A-3.1(14)

.

§ 114-4.3.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 702, s. 7.